Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2008.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5331YH (4) 91 dg/ko H.F. 2008 Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ STATE 1 CHILD CARE ASSISTANCE REIMBURSEMENTS FOR CHILDREN RECEIVING 2 CHILD FOSTER CARE. 3 1. For purposes of this section: 4 a. âChild care facilityâ means the same as defined in 5 section 237A.1. 6 b. âChild care providerâ means a person that provides 7 child care as that term is defined in section 237A.1, and that 8 is eligible to receive payments from the state child care 9 assistance program established in section 237A.13. 10 c. âFoster childâ means a child receiving child foster care 11 as that term is defined in section 237.1. 12 2. The department of health and human services shall amend 13 the departmentâs rules pursuant to chapter 17A to provide 14 payment to a child care provider for a foster child not in 15 attendance at the child care facility operated by the child 16 care provider in an amount not to exceed sixteen half days 17 per consecutive twelve-month period, provided that the foster 18 child is regularly scheduled to receive child care during 19 those sixteen half days, and the child care provider also 20 charges individuals not participating in the state child care 21 assistance program for days an individualâs child is absent. 22